Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-402
Public utility districts; how created.

Any water main district, gas main district, sanitary sewer district, storm water disposal district, or other public utility district as provided in section 18-401 shall be created by ordinance if such public utility district is created by a city or village, or by resolution of the board of directors of a metropolitan utilities district if such public utility district is created by a metropolitan utilities district.

Laws 1921, c. 110, § 2, p. 386;

C.S.1922, § 4476;

C.S.1929, § 18-1002;

R.S.1943, § 18-402;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 13.